src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-am_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# Proofreadf, is correct.
# (Skribnik/Afanasieva 2007: 64-65)

  Pronoun - ам: # Noun 122 'eng I/fin minä' - full paradigm
#
     ам+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom: ам
     ам+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc: а̄нум
     ам+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat: а̄нумн
     ам+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Abl: а̄нумныл
     ам+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ins: а̄нумтыл

     ам+Pron+Pers+Du1+Nom: ме̄н
     ам+Pron+Pers+Du1+Acc: ме̄наме̄н
     ам+Pron+Pers+Du1+Dat: ме̄наме̄нн
     ам+Pron+Pers+Du1+Abl: ме̄наме̄нныл
     ам+Pron+Pers+Du1+Ins: ме̄наме̄нтыл

     ам+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom: ма̄н
     ам+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc: ма̄нама̄н
     ам+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Dat: ма̄нама̄нн
     ам+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Abl: ма̄нама̄нныл
     ам+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ins: ма̄нама̄нтыл

# Emphatic and refelxive personal pronouns

     ам+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom: амки
     ам+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc: [амкинам, амким]
     ам+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat: [амкинамн, амкимн]
     ам+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Abl: [амкинамныл, акимныл]
     ам+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ins: [акинамтыл, амкимтыл]

     ам+Pron+Pers+Du1+Nom: ме̄нки
     ам+Pron+Pers+Du1+Acc: [ме̄нкина̄ме̄н, ме̄нкиме̄н]
     ам+Pron+Pers+Du1+Dat: [ме̄нкина̄ме̄н, ме̄нкиме̄нн]
     ам+Pron+Pers+Du1+Abl: [ме̄нкина̄ме̄нын, ме̄нкина̄ме̄нныл, ме̄нкиме̄нныл]
     ам+Pron+Pers+Du1+Ins: [ме̄нкина̄ме̄нтыл, ме̄нкиме̄нтыл, ме̄нкина̄ме̄н, ме̄нкиме̄нт]

     ам+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom: ма̄нки
     ам+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc: [ма̄нкина̄в, ма̄нкиюв]
     ам+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Dat: [ма̄нкина̄вн, ма̄нкиювн]
     ам+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Abl: [ма̄нкина̄вныл, ма̄нкмювныл, ма̄нкивныл]
     ам+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ins: [ма̄нкина̄втыл, ма̄нкиювтыл, ма̄нкина̄вт, ма̄нкивт]


# Solitary personal pronouns

     ам+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom: [амкем, амккем, амке̄мт, амкке̄мт]
     ам+Pron+Pers+Du1+Nom: [ме̄нккеме̄н, ме̄нкеме̄н, ме̄нкемнт]
     ам+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom: [ма̄нкке̄в, ма̄нке̄в, ма̄нке̄вт]


  Pronoun - наӈ: # Noun 122 'eng I/fin minä' - full paradigm

     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom: наӈ
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc: наӈын
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat: наӈынн
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Abl: наӈынныл
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ins: наӈынтыл

     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Du2+Nom: нэ̄н
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Du2+Acc: нэ̄нан
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Du2+Dat: нэ̄нанн
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Du2+Abl: нэ̄нанныл
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Du2+Ins: нэ̄нантыл

     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom: на̄н
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc: на̄нан
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dat: на̄нанн
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Abl: на̄нанныл
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ins: на̄нантыл

# Other

     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom: наӈки
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc: [наӈкина̄нын, наӈкиа̄н]
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat: [наӈкина̄ны̄н, наӈкиа̄нн]
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Abl: [наӈкиа̄нныл, наӈкинныл, наӈкинынныл, наӈкина̄нынныл]
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ins: [наӈкина̄нтыл, наӈкинтыл, наӈкина̄ны̄нтыл, наӈкина̄ны̄нт, наӈкина̄нт]

     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Du2+Nom: нэ̄нки
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Du2+Acc: [нэ̄нкина̄н, нэ̄нкин]
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Du2+Dat: [нэ̄нкина̄нынн, нэ̄нкинн]
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Du2+Abl: [нэ̄нкина̄нынныл, нэ̄нкиа̄нныл, нэ̄нкинныл]
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Du2+Ins: [нэ̄нкина̄нынтыл, нэ̄нкина̄нныл, нэ̄нкинныл]

     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom: на̄нки
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc: [на̄нкинан, накин]
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dat: [на̄нкина̄нынн, на̄нкина̄нынн, на̄нкинн]
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Abl: [на̄нкина̄нынныл, на̄нкина̄нныл, на̄нкинныл]
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ins: [на̄нкина̄нынтыл, на̄нкина̄нтыл, на̄нкина̄нт, на̄нкинт]

# Solitary personal pronouns

     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom: [наӈккен, наӈкен, наӈке̄нт, наӈкке̄нт]
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Du2+Nom: [нэ̄нкке̄н, нэ̄нке̄н, нэ̄нке̄нт]
     наӈ+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom: [на̄нкке̄н, на̄нке̄н, на̄нке̄нт]

  Pronoun - тав: # Noun 122 'eng I/fin minä' - full paradigm
  
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: тав
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc: таве
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat: таве̄н
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abl: таве̄нныл
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ins: таве̄нтыл

     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: тэ̄н
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc: тэ̄натэ̄н
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat: тэ̄натэ̄нн
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abl: тэ̄натэ̄нныл
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ins: тэ̄натэ̄нтыл

     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: та̄н
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc: та̄наныл
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat: та̄нанылн
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abl: та̄нанылныл
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ins: та̄нанылтыл

# Other

     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: такви
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc: [таквина̄тэ, таквитэ]
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat: [таквина̄тэ̄н, тавкитэ̄н]
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abl: [таквина̄тэ̄ныл, таквитэ̄ныл, таквитэ̄нныл, тавкитэ̄лн]
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ins: [таквина̄тэ̄тыл, таквитэ̄тыл, таквина̄тэ̄т, тавкитэ̄т]

     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: тэ̄нки
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc: [тэ̄нкина̄тэ̄н, тэ̄нкитэ̄н]
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat: [тэ̄нкина̄тэ̄нн, тэ̄нкитэ̄нн]
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abl: [тэ̄нкина̄тэ̄нныл, тэ̄нкитэ̄нныл]
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ins: [тэ̄нкина̄тэ̄нтыл, тэ̄нкитэ̄нтыл, тэ̄нкина̄тэ̄нт, тэ̄нкитэ̄нт]

     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: та̄нки
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc: [та̄нкина̄наныл, та̄нкина̄нылн, та̄нкиянылн]
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat: [та̄нкина̄нанылн, та̄нкина̄нылн, та̄нкиянылн]
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abl: [та̄нкина̄ны̄лныл, та̄нкина̄наны̄лныл, та̄нкмянылныл]
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ins: [та̄нкина̄наны̄лтыл, та̄нкина̄ны̄лтыл, та̄нкина̄нылт, та̄нкиянылт]

 
# Solitary personal pronouns

     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: [такке̄т, такке̄тэ, тавке̄т, тавкэ̄тэ]
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: [тэ̄нккетэ̄н, тэ̄нкетэ̄н, тэ̄нкетэ̄нт]
     тав+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: [та̄нкке̄нл, та̄нке̄нл, та̄нке̄нылт]
